California statutes. Education Code
(a) The State Board of Education is designated the state board of vocational education, which is the sole state agency responsible for the administration or the supervision of the state vocational education program, as required by the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (P.L. 98-524), the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act Amendments of 1990 (P.L. 101-392; 20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 and following), and any acts amending or succeeding those acts. The State Board of Education is granted all necessary power and authority to carry out those provisions of federal law.

(b) In recognition of the need for coordinated delivery of vocational education and training in California, the State Board of Education and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, which shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide for an advisory committee composed of an equal number of members of each board.

(2) Assure shared planning and coordination.

(3) Delegate to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, in keeping with the requirements of federal law, the maximum responsibility in administration, operation, and supervision of policies and procedures related to community college vocational programs provided for in federal law.

(c) In carrying out the provisions of federal law, the State Board of Education, prior to taking final action on any proposed policies, procedures, or allocations of funds, shall consider recommendations, if any, of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and make a record of review and comment on the proposed policies, procedures, or allocations of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12054.

For the purpose of implementing the program set forth in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10650) of Part 2 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, funds available may be used to provide vocational education services to present and potential recipients of public assistance, to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12055.

The Vocational Education Federal Fund in the State Treasury is hereby created. All grants of money received by this state from the United States, the expenditure of which is administered under the provisions of Sections 12050 to 12054, inclusive, and Sections 12020, 12220, and 12300 to 12307, inclusive, on order of the State Controller, shall be deposited in the Vocational Education Federal Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12056.

The State Treasurer, as required by the federal acts relating to vocational education referred to in Sections 12050 to 12054, inclusive, and Sections 12020, 12220, and 12300 to 12307, inclusive, shall receive and provide for the proper custody of all funds apportioned to the state under these acts. The amount received shall be deposited to the credit of the Vocational Education Federal Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12057.

The State Treasurer shall also receive and provide for the proper custody of all money appropriated by this article, of all money that may be hereafter appropriated for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article and of all money that may be received by the State Board of Education under the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12058.

All funds appropriated by the state for vocational education shall be expended pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12059.

All money in the Vocational Education Federal Fund is hereby appropriated to the State Department of Education, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure for the purposes for which the money deposited therein is made available by the United States for expenditure by the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12060.

The Director of Finance and the State Controller may approve any general plan whereby:

(a) Any expenditures which are a proper charge against money made available by the United States and deposited in the Vocational Education Federal Fund may be paid in the first instance from any appropriation from the General Fund, expenditures from which are administered under the provisions of Sections 12050 to 12054, inclusive, and Sections 12020, 12220, and 12300 to 12307, inclusive, and

(b) The General Fund shall be reimbursed for expenditures made therefrom that are a proper charge against the Vocational Education Federal Fund. Such a general plan may provide for advance transfer from the Vocational Education Federal Fund to the General Fund, based on estimates of such expenditures that will be subject to reimbursement from the Vocational Education Federal Fund pursuant to such plan, and may provide for reimbursement to the Vocational Education Federal Fund when necessary.

Requests for reimbursement or transfer pursuant to such a plan shall be furnished to the State Controller in writing by the Department of Education, accompanied by such financial statements as the plan may provide; and on order of the State Controller, the required amount shall be transferred in accordance therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Veterans’ Education [12090. - 12095.]

12090.

Subject to the provisions of this article, the State Department of Education acting by and through the Director of Education is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement, or agreements, with the Veterans Administration, or any other agency of the federal government, for the education of veterans in any of the schools of the public school system, except the California State University. The contract shall provide for the payment to the schools through the State Department of Education or otherwise of the maximum amount permitted by the act, or acts, of Congress under which the agreement, or agreements, is entered into by the Veterans Administration, or any other agency of the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

12091.

The Director of Education is vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with any such agency of the federal government in the administration of any applicable act of Congress and rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12092.

The Department of Education through the Director of Education is authorized to enter into agreements with governing boards of school districts for the education by such districts of veterans in accordance with the agreement between the Department of Education and the agency of the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

12093.

The governing board of any school district which entered into an agreement with the Department of Education under this article may do any and all things required or authorized by such agreement of the board or district, including, but not limited to, the purchase of books, supplies and equipment for veterans educated under such agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12094.

The Department of Education shall exercise general supervision over, and shall provide for the coordination of, all services and facilities performed and provided by school districts for the education of veterans to the end that the needs of the veterans shall be met in the most adequate manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12095.

The provisions of Sections 12020, 12220, and 12300 to 12307, inclusive, shall apply to all funds received by the state or any agency of the state under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Surplus Federal Property [12110. - 12117.]

12110.

The State Department of Education is hereby designated as the California State Agency for Donated Food Distribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 1.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12111.

The California State Agency for Donated Food Distribution is authorized and directed to cooperate with the federal government and its agencies in securing the expeditious and equitable distribution of surplus food commodities donated by the federal government to public agencies, institutions, and organizations in California, to assist those public agencies, institutions, and organizations in securing those food commodities and to do all things necessary to the execution of its powers and duties.

The state agency may enter into cooperative agreements with federal agencies to assist it in carrying out the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12112.

Whenever by any act of Congress or any rule or regulation adopted thereunder the agency is authorized to accept, receive, or purchase for resale from the federal government or any agency thereof, or any state agency at the request of, and with the approval of, the Department of General Services, any food commodities and to provide for its disposition or resale, it is authorized to do so and is vested with all necessary power and authority to accomplish the acceptance, purchase, receipt, disposition and resale. The agency is hereby exempted from Article 2 (commencing with Section 14790) of Chapter 6 of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 3.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12113.

(1) The California State Agency for Donated Food Distribution in providing for the disposition of food commodities shall require the payment of such charges by the parties to whom food commodities are transferred as the agency estimates will reimburse the agency for the average costs of procuring, storing, handling, and disposing of those food commodities. All moneys received by the agency for charges under this section or its predecessor shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Donated Property Revolving Fund. The agency may reduce or eliminate charges on donated food commodities found not to be usable for the purpose for which procured. Any moneys found by the agency to be in excess of the costs incurred in procuring, storing, handling, and disposing of donated food commodities may, upon approval of the Department of Finance, be refunded to the parties from whom the moneys were received. Moneys refunded to the state agencies specified in subdivision (2) of this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury as provided in that subdivision.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, (a) the State Department of Education, acting for state agencies supported principally from the General Fund, and (b) state agencies supported principally from a special fund of the State Treasury, shall deposit refunds received under subdivision (1) of this section to the credit of the state fund from which the state agency receives its principal support. The Department of Finance shall determine the fund from which the state agency receives its principal support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 4.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12114.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any party receiving surplus food pursuant to this article which elects to take direct delivery thereof from the federal government shall be required to reimburse the agency only for the actual cost to the agency of processing the documents relating to each such direct delivery of surplus food. Any party electing to take direct delivery must demonstrate that party’s capability for the proper storage and distribution of the surplus food in accordance with regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12115.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Donated Food Revolving Fund. The State Department of Education shall identify all assets in the Surplus Property Revolving Fund. The assets shall be separated by the State Department of Education into those assets which pertain to the Surplus Personal Property Program and those assets which pertain to the Donated Food Program. The unencumbered assets pertaining to surplus personal property will be transferred to the Department of General Services and deposited in the Surplus Personal Property Revolving Fund. The cash resources of the Donated Food Program shall be deposited into the Donated Food Revolving Fund. All costs of the California State Agency for Donated Food Distribution, including, but not limited to, costs of procuring, transporting, shipping, and storing surplus property or food commodities of the federal government or other agencies or individuals and its distribution to public agencies and other eligible institutions and organizations, costs of general assistance and real property procurement, and costs of consultant and contract services, shall be paid from this fund. The Donated Food Revolving Fund shall be reimbursed from the support appropriation for the agency for costs of general assistance and real property procurement in accordance with Sections 11251 and 11252 of the Government Code. The Surplus Property Revolving Fund shall cease to be a fund in the State Treasury when notification is received from the State Department of Education, verified by the Department of Finance, that all balances in the fund have been reduced to zero.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 5.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12116.

The California State Agency for Donated Food Distribution may send representatives out of this state for the purpose of inspecting food commodities or conferring with federal and other state officials, provided the traveling and expenses have been approved by the Governor and by the Department of Finance. The out-of-state travel shall not come within the limitation imposed in Section 33335 or 71049.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 6.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12117.

(a) The State Agency for Donated Food Distribution may, without at the time furnishing vouchers or itemized statements, draw from the Donated Food Revolving Fund for use as a departmental revolving fund either of the following:

(1) A sum not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(2) With the approval of the Department of Finance, a sum in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(b) Any moneys withdrawn pursuant to subdivision (a) may only be used, in accordance with law and the Department of General Services rules, for payment of compensation
 earned, traveling expense, traveling expense advances, or where immediate payment is otherwise necessary. All disbursements from the revolving fund shall be substantiated by vouchers filed with and audited by the Controller. From time to time, disbursements, supported by vouchers, may be reported to the Controller in connection with claims for reimbursement of the departmental revolving fund. At any time upon the demand of the Department of Finance or the Controller, the revolving fund shall be accounted for and substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements submitted to and audited by the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 18.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Libraries [12130. - 12130.]

12130.

The California State Library is hereby named and designated as the proper state entity to accept, receive and administer any and all funds, moneys or library materials, granted, furnished, provided, appropriated, dedicated or made available by the United States or any of its departments, commissions, boards, bureaus or agencies for the purpose of giving aid to public libraries in the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 78.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Review of Federal Fund Expenditures [12140. - 12143.]

12140.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article, consistent with the provisions added by Chapter 1284 of the Statutes of 1978, to provide greater oversight of, and to facilitate the scrutiny of, programs funded by moneys received from the federal government which are deposited in the State Treasury for expenditure by, and disbursement to, state and local educational agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

12141.

(a) Commencing with the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Finance, shall prepare a comprehensive state plan, to be submitted to the Legislature by January 1st, detailing the prospective expenditure, allocation, and apportionment of federal funds to be appropriated for the next fiscal year pursuant to Section 13338.5 of the Government Code to all educational agencies in this state, including the Department of Education, receiving federal funds for their support.

(b) Commencing with the 1982–83 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the state plan required by subdivision (a) of this section shall be prepared in the same form and be compatible with fiscal reporting requirements prescribed by subdivision (g) of Section 13337 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

12142.

(a) Commencing with the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Finance, shall prepare a comprehensive report to be submitted to the Legislature by January 1st which sets forth in detail the manner in which all federal funds were allocated and apportioned to, and expended by, educational agencies in this state in the prior fiscal year.

(b) Commencing with the 1982–83 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the report required by subdivision (a) of this section shall be prepared in the same form and be compatible with fiscal reporting requirements prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 13300 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

12143.

The department shall submit to the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Governor the following two annual reports on federal funds for education in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive:

(a) One report, to be submitted no later than February 15 of each year, shall provide a three-year tracking of federal funds. For each federally funded program, the report shall include detail by type of funded activity (state administration, state-level activity, local assistance, and capital outlay) and state budget category (state operations, local assistance, and capital outlay). For each program, by type of funded activity and state budget category, the report shall include all of the following:

(1) Actual expenditures for the prior year.

(2) A revised estimate of current year expenditures.

(3) The budget-year appropriation.

(b) The other report, to be submitted no later than November 1 of each year, shall identify available federal carryover funds. Specifically, this report shall identify carryover funds, by fiscal year and potential reversion date, for each federally funded program by type of funded activity (state administration, state-level activity, local assistance, and capital outlay) and state budget category (state operations, local assistance, and capital outlay).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration of Federal Programs—Board of Governors [12200. - 12220.]



  ARTICLE 1. Programs Prior to 1967 [12200. - 12200.]

12200.

The State Board of Education is vested with all necessary power and authority to perform all acts necessary to authorize governing boards of districts maintaining community colleges to receive the benefits and to expend the funds provided by any acts of Congress under which districts maintaining community colleges may be eligible to receive benefits, including, but not limited to, Title VII of the Housing Act of 1961 (Public Law 87-70), as amended, and any of the acts of Congress referred to in this chapter. The board is vested with all necessary power and authority to authorize districts maintaining community colleges to cooperate with the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof, for the purpose of receiving the benefits and expending the funds provided by said acts of Congress, or any rules or regulations adopted thereunder, or any state plan or rules or regulations of the California Postsecondary Education Commission adopted in accordance with any of said acts of Congress under which the California Postsecondary Education Commission is designated in this chapter as the state educational agency. Whenever necessary to secure the full benefits of said acts of Congress, the governing board may give such security as may be required and may comply with such conditions as may be imposed by the federal government. The funds received by the district under the provisions of said acts of Congress shall be deposited in the county treasury as provided for in Section 84001.

This section shall be applicable to only those acts of Congress which have been enacted prior to January 1, 1967.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Authority [12220. - 12220.]

12220.

Whenever by the provisions of any act of Congress the act is to be administered in the state by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or any one or more of the officers, or agencies, the officers and agencies designated in the act of the Congress are authorized to administer the act in the state. The officers and agencies are vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof in the administration of the act of Congress and rules and regulations lawfully adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administration of Federal Programs—Other Agencies [12300. - 12320.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Allocation Board [12300. - 12307.]

12300.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Section 12020, 12220, and 12300 to 12307, inclusive, whenever by any act of Congress funds are provided as federal aid to education to the several states for apportionment or allocation to school districts or community college districts for the purposes set forth in this section, and such act of Congress does not require that it be administered in this state by a state officer or agency other than the State Allocation Board, such act, with respect to the funds herein mentioned, shall be administered and such funds shall be apportioned by the State Allocation Board under the Local Agency Allocation Act.

The funds to which this section shall apply are funds appropriated by Congress for (a) the purchase and improvement of school sites; or (b) the purchase of furniture and equipment; or (c) the planning and construction, reconstruction, repair, alteration of, and addition to, school buildings and incidental facilities. 

The State Allocation Board shall by rule provide for securing the recommendations or approval of the Department of Education or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, as the case may be, as to the facilities to be provided.

Funds apportioned under this section shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of Section 12302 on claims submitted by the Director of General Services. 

The State Allocation Board is hereby authorized to accept any such funds on behalf of the state, and to cooperate with the government of the United States or any agency or agencies thereof in the administration of the act of Congress and rules and regulations lawfully adopted thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

The State Treasurer is designated as the custodian of all funds received by the state from the government of the United States or of any agency or agencies thereof and he is authorized to receive, and provide for the proper custody of, all moneys so received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.

The funds received by the state under Sections 12020, 12220, and 12300 to 12307, inclusive, shall be expended by the officers or agency administering the program to carry out the provisions of the act of the Congress and rules and regulations lawfully adopted thereunder. These funds are exempt from Section 925.6 of the Government Code and shall be paid out by the Treasurer on warrants drawn by the Controller on claims submitted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

12303.

The assent of the state is given to the provisions in the act of Congress entitled “An act to promote the mining of potash on the public domain,” and approved by the President February 7, 1927, and to the provisions of the act of Congress entitled “An act to authorize exploration for and disposition of potassium,” approved by the President October 2, 1917.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.

All money derived from bonuses, royalties, and rentals under the provisions of the acts of Congress referred to in Section 12303, or either of said acts, and apportioned under the acts, or either of said acts, to the state shall be received by the State Treasurer and by him paid to the school districts and community college districts of the state as provided in Sections 12303 to 12307, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12305.

The money shall be apportioned among the school districts and community college districts in which potash leases or deposits are situated in the proportion which the total amount of rents, royalties, and other payments made to the United States from potash leases or deposits in each district bears to the total amount paid to the United States from leases or deposits in all districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.

If any potash deposit or lease or any part thereof is wholly located within the boundaries of two or more elementary, high or unified school districts, or community college districts, the districts shall share equally in the apportionments made under Section 12305 which are attributable to the lease or deposit or part thereof situated within their boundaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this article or Section 2795 of the Public Resources Code, the Controller shall apportion money received pursuant to Section 12304 for potash deposits located in the Trona Joint Unified School District and the Kern Community College District as follows:

(a) Kern Community College District shall receive 15 percent of the total apportionment.

(b) Trona Joint Unified School District shall receive 85 percent of the total apportionment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 124, Sec. 1.   Effective July 6, 1987.   Applicable from July 1, 1986, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.

The payments shall be deposited in the general fund of the districts and shall be in addition to any other moneys paid or credited to the districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Treasurer [12320. - 12320.]

12320.

The assent of the state is given to the provisions in the act of Congress entitled “An act to promote the mining of coal, phosphate, oil, oil shale, gas and sodium on the public domain,” and approved by the President, February 25, 1920.

All money derived from bonuses, royalties, and rentals under the act of Congress referred to in this section and apportioned under the act to the state, shall be received by the State Treasurer and by him credited to the State School Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Participation in Federal Programs [12400. - 12405.]

12400.

The governing board of a school district on behalf of any school maintained by the district and any county superintendent of schools are vested with all necessary power and authority to perform all acts necessary to receive the benefits and to expend the funds provided by any act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted, and with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with, or enter into agreements with, the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof, and with the State Board of Education and with other school districts and private or public nonprofit organizations for the purpose of receiving the benefits and expending the funds provided by the acts of Congress, in accordance with the acts, or any rules or regulations adopted thereunder, or any state plan or rules or regulations of the State Board of Education adopted in accordance with the acts of Congress. Participation may also include the expenditure by the governing board of any school district or the county superintendent of schools of whatever funds may be required by the federal government as a condition to participation.

Participation in the act of Congress known as the “Emergency Employment Act of 1971” (P.L. 92-54) may be undertaken notwithstanding Section 44858.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.

To the extent permitted by, and pursuant to, federal law, agreements may be entered into by the governing board of a school district without prior approval of the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

12402.

The governing board of a school district, on behalf of any school maintained by the district, and any county superintendent of schools, is vested with all necessary power and authority to perform all acts necessary, provided the acts are consistent with other provisions contained in this code, to implement nutrition programs for the elderly, so long as there is available funding for the programs. Nutrition programs for the elderly shall include, but shall not be limited to, programs authorized pursuant to the McCarthy-Kennick Nutrition Program for the Elderly Act of 1972 as provided by Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 18325) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

12403.

All acts or proceedings heretofore taken, in connection with receiving the benefits or expending the funds provided by these acts of Congress are hereby ratified and confirmed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12405.

The governing board of any school district is authorized to accept the provisions of any act of Congress under which federal funds are available for purposes of this chapter, and may participate in any program provided thereunder in order to accept and expend the federal funds pursuant to the act of Congress and this chapter. Participation may include the expenditure by the district of whatever funds may be required by the federal government as a condition to participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 105.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Interstate Agreements [12500. - 12515.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Interstate Agreement on Qualification of Educational Personnel [12500. - 12501.]

12500.

The Interstate Agreement on Qualification of Educational Personnel is hereby entered into with all jurisdictions joining therein, in the form as follows:
Article I. Purpose, Findings, and Policy

1. The states party to this agreement, desiring by common action to improve their respective school systems by utilizing the teacher or other professional educational person wherever educated, declare that it is the policy of each of them, on the basis of cooperation with one another, to take advantage of the preparation and experience of such persons wherever gained, thereby serving the best interests of society, of education, and of the teaching profession. It is the purpose of this agreement to provide for the development and execution of such programs of cooperation as will facilitate the movement of teachers and other professional educational personnel among the states party to it, and to authorize specific interstate educational personnel contracts to achieve that end.

2. The party states find that included in the large movement of population among all sections of the nation are many qualified educational personnel who move for family and other personal reasons but who are hindered in using their professional skill and experience in their new locations. Variations from state to state in requirements for qualifying educational personnel discourage such personnel from taking the steps necessary to qualify in other states. As a consequence, a significant number of professionally prepared and experienced educators is lost to our school systems. Facilitating the employment of qualified educational personnel, without reference to their states of origin, can increase the available educational resources. Participation in this compact can increase the availability of educational manpower. 
 
Article II. Definitions
As used in this agreement and contracts made pursuant to it, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

1. “Educational personnel” means persons who must meet requirements pursuant to state law as a condition of employment in educational programs.

2. “Designated state official” means the education official of a state selected by that state to negotiate and enter into, on behalf of his state, contracts pursuant to this agreement.

3. “Accept,” or any variant thereof, means to recognize and give effect to one or more determinations of another state relating to the qualifications of educational personnel in lieu of making or requiring a like determination that would otherwise be required by or pursuant to the laws of a receiving state.

4. “State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

5. “Originating state” means a state (and the subdivision thereof, if any) whose determination that certain educational personnel are qualified to be employed for specific duties in schools is acceptable in accordance with the terms of a contract made pursuant to Article III.

6. “Receiving state” means a state (and the subdivisions thereof) which accept educational personnel in accordance with the terms of a contract made pursuant to Article III.
 
Article III. Interstate Educational Personnel Contracts
1. The designated state official of a party state may make one or more contracts on behalf of his state with one or more other party states providing for the acceptance of educational personnel. Any such contract for the period of its duration shall be applicable to and binding on the states whose designated state officials enter into it, and the subdivisions of those states, with the same force and effect as if incorporated in this agreement. A designated state official may enter into a contract pursuant to this article only with states in which he finds that there are programs of education, certification standards or other acceptable qualifications that assure preparation or qualification of educational personnel on a basis sufficiently comparable, even though not identical to that prevailing in his own state.

2. Any such contract shall provide for:

(a) Its duration.

(b) The criteria to be applied by an originating state in qualifying educational personnel for acceptance by a receiving state.

(c) Such waivers, substitutions, and conditional acceptances as shall aid the practical effectuation of the contract without sacrifice of basic educational standards.

(d) Any other necessary matters.

3. No contract made pursuant to this agreement shall be for a term longer than five years but any such contract may be renewed for like or lesser periods.

4. Any contract dealing with acceptance of educational personnel on the basis of their having completed an educational program shall specify the earliest date or dates on which originating state approval of the program or programs involved can have occurred. No contract made pursuant to this agreement shall require acceptance by a receiving state of any persons qualified because of successful completion of a program prior to January 1, 1954.

5. The certification or other acceptance of a person who has been accepted pursuant to the terms of a contract shall not be revoked or otherwise impaired because the contract has expired or been terminated. However, any certificate or other qualifying document may be revoked or suspended on any ground which would be sufficient for revocation or suspension of a certificate or other qualifying document initially granted or approved in the receiving state.

6. A contract committee composed of the designated state officials of the contracting states or their representatives shall keep the contract under continuous review, study means of improving its administration, and report no less frequently than once a year to the heads of the appropriate education agencies of the contracting states.
 
Article IV. Approved and Accepted Programs
1. Nothing in this agreement shall be construed to repeal or otherwise modify any law or regulation of a party state relating to the approval of programs of educational preparation having effect solely on the qualification of educational personnel within that state.

2. To the extent that contracts made pursuant to this agreement deal with the educational requirements for the proper qualification of educational personnel, acceptance of a program of educational preparation shall be in accordance with such procedures and requirements as may be provided in the applicable contract. 
 